Utah statutes.
63M-1-3002.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Allocated volume cap" means a volume cap for which a certificate of allocation is in effect or for which bonds have been issued.

(2)  "Allotment accounts" means the various accounts created in Section 63M-1-3006.

(3)  "Board of review" means the Private Activity Bond Review Board created in Section 63M-1-3003.

(4)  "Bond" means any obligation for which an allocation of volume cap is required by the code.

(5)  "Code" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and any related Internal Revenue Service regulations.

(6)  "Form 8038" means the Department of the Treasury tax form 8038 (OMB No. 1545-0720) or any other federal tax form or other method of reporting required by the Department of the Treasury under Section 149(e) of the code.

(7)  "Issuing authority" means:

(a)  any county, city, or town in the state;

(b)  any not-for-profit corporation or joint agency, or other entity acting on behalf of one or more counties, cities, towns, or any combination of these;

(c)  the state; or

(d)  any other entity authorized to issue bonds under state law.

(8)  "State" means the state of Utah and any of its agencies, institutions, and divisions authorized to issue bonds or certificates under state law.

(9)  "Volume cap" means the private activity bond volume cap for the state as computed under Section 146 of the code.

(10)  "Year" means each calendar year.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 370, 2011 General Session

